Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-180
Seward.

The county of Seward is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township nine, north, of range one, east; thence east to the southeast corner of township nine, north, of range four, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township twelve, north, of range four, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township twelve, north, of range one, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 48, p. 221;

R.S.1913, § 895;

C.S.1922, § 797;

C.S.1929, § 25-184;

R.S.1943, § 22-180.